apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="gõ_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>odẽ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>odame</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oa</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gom/e_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oa</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũ_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>udẽ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>udame</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>uda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ua</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ume</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ume</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũbg/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>idẽ</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũ/si_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>idẽ</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gil/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>idẽ</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũnug/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>idẽ</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gũus/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>idẽ</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dame</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gʋls/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ndẽ</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>l-y</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ndame</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nda</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>lame</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="gʋʋ/le_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ndẽ</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>l-y</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ndame</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nda</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>lame</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="gili">             <i>gil</i><par n="gil/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gõ">              <i>gõ</i><par n="gõ_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gome">             <i>gom</i><par n="gom/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũsi">              <i>gũ</i><par n="gũ/si_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũbgi">            <i>gũbg</i><par n="gũbg/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũnugi">           <i>gũnug</i><par n="gũnug/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũusi">            <i>gũus</i><par n="gũus/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gʋlse">            <i>gʋls</i><par n="gʋls/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gʋʋle">             <i>gʋʋ</i><par n="gʋʋ/le_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gili">             <i>gil</i><par n="gil/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gõ">              <i>gõ</i><par n="gõ_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gome">             <i>gom</i><par n="gom/e_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũsi">              <i>gũ</i><par n="gũ/si_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũbgi">            <i>gũbg</i><par n="gũbg/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũnugi">           <i>gũnug</i><par n="gũnug/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gũusi">            <i>gũus</i><par n="gũus/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gʋlse">            <i>gʋls</i><par n="gʋls/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gʋʋle">             <i>gʋʋ</i><par n="gʋʋ/le_vblex"/></e>
